Washington statutes.
RCW 2.70.010

Director—Appointment—Qualifications—Salary.

The supreme court shall appoint the director of the office of public defense from a list of three names submitted by the advisory committee created under RCW 2.70.030. Qualifications shall include admission to the practice of law in this state for at least five years, experience in providing indigent defense services, and proven managerial or supervisory experience. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the supreme court and receive a salary to be fixed by the advisory committee.

[ 2008 c 313 s 3; 1996 c 221 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 313: See note following RCW 2.70.005.